Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 10. Wyoming Territorial Prison State Park and Historical Site

§ 36-8-1001.
Wyoming Territorial Prison state historic site.

The lands in Albany County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 and known as the Wyoming Territorial Prison are declared to be a state historic site. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the state historic site.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

The state historic site shall be known as the “Wyoming territorial prison state historic site”.

The board of land commissioners shall not trade, sell or otherwise dispose of the lands described in subsection (a) of this section without approval of the legislature.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall prepare a plan for the operation of the Wyoming territorial prison historic site by the department as part of the department’s comprehensive plan under W.S.

36-4-106

:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

through (vii) Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 2.

The department of state parks and cultural resources is authorized to enter into leasehold or concession agreements in accordance with the plan provided by subsection (d) of this section. Funds received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited and expended in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(h).

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 112, § 1; 1987, ch. 207, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2004, ch. 73, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 97, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2010, ch. 11, §§ 2, 3; ch. 82, § 3; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective March 5, 2004, rewrote (d) through (f), generally transferring management of the Wyoming territorial state prison park and historic site from the Wyoming economic development and stabilization board to the department of state parks and cultural resources.

Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2005 amendment

added the second sentence in (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 97, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted the former second sentence in the introductory language of (d), which read: “The plan shall be presented to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee not later than September 1, 2004.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first amendment, by ch 11, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2010, rewrote (a) and repealed former (a)(i) pertaining to statutory legal descriptions; substituted “historic” for “park and historical” twice in (b); substituted “paragraph (a)” for “paragraph (a)(i)” in (c);
in the introductory language of (d), deleted “and state park” following “historic site” and “In developing the plan, the department shall” at the end; and repealed former (d)(i) and (d)(ii) pertaining to exclusion and boundary between state park and historical site.

The second amendment, by ch 82, § 3, effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (d)(viii), which read: “Cooperate with the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission in development of the park for maximum beneficial use by citizens and tourists.”

The 2011 amendment,

in (c), substituted “subsection” for “paragraph.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Legislative purpose. —

Laws 1986, ch. 112, § 2, provides: “The Wyoming legislature recognizes the need to maximize and expand tourism potential within the state to enhance economic development. It also recognizes the unique historical sites located within southeast Wyoming and that the Wyoming territorial prison and adjacent buildings represent one (1) of these unique sites. Further, development of the site provides the state an opportunity to commemorate the 1990 Wyoming centennial celebration. For these purposes, the Wyoming legislature establishes the Wyoming territorial prison state park and historical site.”

Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to transfer management of the Wyoming territorial state prison park and historic site from the single management group to the department of state parks and cultural resources, and for complete transfer of management to be accomplished no later than April 30, 2005. The department, with the advice and approval of the attorney general, is authorized to negotiate for and terminate any and all leases or contracts currently in existence pertaining to the management of all or any portion of the state park and historic site by any entity other than the department and to take such further actions as necessary to effectuate the intent of this act. Until such time as current leases or contracts are terminated and complete management of the park and site is vested in the department under this act, the park and site may be operated by the department or a single management group as authorized under W.S.

36-8-1001

and

36-8-1002

prior to the amendment of those provisions under this act, as mutually agreed by the department and the management group. Any funds accruing to the state as a result of the termination of any contract or lease pursuant to this act shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into an account within the earmarked revenue fund. The department shall submit a copy of the plan required by W.S.

36-8-1001

(d) to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 36-8-1002.
Transfer of lands; site administration; lease and contract agreements.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall administer, operate and maintain the historic site:

In accordance with the plan specified under W.S. 36-8-1001(d). The department may, under lease agreement or contract management arrangement with a local public or private nonprofit entity, provide for special events at the historic site in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(o) or management of specified areas of the park by the public or private entity;

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may impose an admissions fee in excess of fees charged for admissions to other state parks and sites, to fund necessary expenses incurred for park and site development, operations and maintenance. Notwithstanding W.S. 36-4-121(h) daily admission fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a separate account and may be expended by the department upon legislative appropriation.

Notwithstanding W.S.

35-9-121

, for the purposes of contested cases involving fire prevention or electrical safety issues, decisions by the city of Laramie are subject to review and final administrative action by the state council on fire prevention, electrical safety and energy efficiency under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Decisions of the council are subject to judicial review under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 91, § 1; 2004, ch. 73, §§ 1, 2; 2005 ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 11, §§ 2, 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective March 5, 2004, rewrote the section, transferring management of the Wyoming territorial state prison park and historic site to the department of state parks and cultural resources.

Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in the last sentence in (d).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, repealed former (a) and (c) pertaining to board of land commissioners transferring title and standards in accordance with National Historic Preservation Act; and in introductory language of (b), deleted “state park, excluding lands and buildings comprising the” preceding “historic site” and deleting “as specified under W.S. 36-8-1001(e), as follows” at the end; and in (b)(i), deleted “Park development, operation and management shall be” at the beginning, and substituted “historic site” for “park.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Legislative purpose. —

Laws 2004, ch. 73, § 3, provides: “It is the intent of this act to transfer management of the Wyoming territorial state prison park and historic site from the single management group to the department of state parks and cultural resources, and for complete transfer of management to be accomplished no later than April 30, 2005. The department, with the advice and approval of the attorney general, is authorized to negotiate for and terminate any and all leases or contracts currently in existence pertaining to the management of all or any portion of the state park and historic site by any entity other than the department and to take such further actions as necessary to effectuate the intent of this act. Until such time as current leases or contracts are terminated and complete management of the park and site is vested in the department under this act, the park and site may be operated by the department or a single management group as authorized under W.S.

36-8-1001

and

36-8-1002

prior to the amendment of those provisions under this act, as mutually agreed by the department and the management group. Any funds accruing to the state as a result of the termination of any contract or lease pursuant to this act shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into an account within the earmarked revenue fund. The department shall submit a copy of the plan required by W.S.

36-8-1001

(d) to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”